Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 801.50 of Title 17, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section:


1. “Affordable” means the lowest cost method of providing


electricity, factoring in the true and total cost of each generation


source including, but not limited to, potential foreign and domestic


supply chain disruptions, environmental degradation, environmental


remediation and excluding any direct or indirect payment by any


level of government in the past five (5) years;


2. “Dispatchable” means a source that is readily available for


use on demand and the output of which can be deployed upon request



Req. No. 2574 Page 1


of a power grid operator or adjusted according to market needs,


except during routine maintenance or repairs;


3. “Green energy” means any energy generated by utilizing those


energy sources listened in 42 U.S.C., Section 15852(b) or, in the


case of hydrocarbons, when combusted for the purpose of electricity


generation, meet the National Ambient Air Quality Standards set by


the United States Environmental Protection Agency and includes


energy generated by nuclear reactors or natural gas;


4. “Reliable” means a source of electricity that is not subject


to intermittent availability or routine expected daily weather and


has a performance standard of eighty percent (80%) or greater and


only falls below such level during routine maintenance or repairs;


and


5. “Foreign adversary nation” means any country that is


designated by the federal government as a foreign adversary or


country of concern, including any country that is:


a. designated as a foreign adversary under 15 C.F.R.,


Section 7.4 or successor regulations,


b. designated as a state sponsor of terrorism by the


United States Department of State,


c. subject to comprehensive federal sanctions


administered by the Office of Foreign Assets Control,


and



Req. No. 2574 Page 2


d. otherwise determined by the Governor, in consultation


with the Attorney General, to pose a national


security, economic security, or supply chain risk to


the United States. The term includes any entity that


is owned, controlled by, or subject to the


jurisdiction or direction of a foreign adversary


nation, including state-owned enterprises,


instrumentalities, or companies operating under


compulsory national laws.


B. The Corporation Commission shall implement standards to


prioritize affordable, reliable, and clean energy security within


this state by:


1. Ensuring that this state prioritizes fuel sources primarily


produced within the United States, with the exception of nuclear


resources and generation;


2. Prohibiting the use of critical materials as defined by the


federal Energy Act of 2020 that are sourced or manufactured by or in


a foreign adversary nation or subject to the provisions of 19


U.S.C., Section 1307;


3. Prioritizing infrastructure and components built in this


state and the United States that are necessary to deliver energy to


customers of this state; and


4. Ensuring a sufficient supply of green energy sources that is


dispatchable to meet the demands of residential and commercial

Req. No. 2574 Page 3


customers at all times with minimal interruptions even during high


usage periods.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2574 CN 12/28/2025 3:48:35 PM







































Req. No. 2574 Page 4